Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Cooperative Insurance Coverage.

Cross references. —

For purpose of the 1978 Act that enacted this article, see § 1, ch. 150, SLA 1978.

Sec. 21.75.300.
Cooperative insurance.

The director shall, by regulation, provide a general plan for the implementation of cooperative insurance coverage limited to the risks defined in AS

21.75.330

.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section must include

procedures whereby not less than the number of persons required by AS

21.75.060(a)

to organize a domestic reciprocal insurer may petition the director to initiate formation of a cooperative insurer;

provision whereby the director may obtain information required to be provided by AS

21.75.060(b)

to implement organization of a domestic reciprocal insurer;

provision under which the petitioners shall describe the territory within which the plan of cooperative insurance shall operate;

provision by which the director may obtain any additional information that the director considers reasonably necessary to determine whether the total amount initially at risk and its distribution permit a sound cooperative insurance operation;

provision whereby the director, after indicating an intention to issue a certificate of authority to a cooperative insurer under AS

21.75.300

—

21.75.330

, shall provide public notice for a period of not less than 30 days to provide nonsubscribing residents within the territory or adjacent geographical area an opportunity to subscribe to the plan of insurance; and

provision by which, after the issuance of a certificate of authority, the cooperative insurer may receive applications from nonsubscribing residents of the territory or adjacent geographical area for inclusion within the insurer unless the application of the nonsubscribing resident is rejected by a majority vote of the members of the subscribers’ advisory committee of the cooperative insurer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 1978; am § 31 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Sec. 21.75.310.
Certificate of authority of cooperative insurer.

If the director is satisfied that the plan of insurance and other information provided by petitioners under AS

21.75.300

permits a sound insurance operation and complies with all other applicable requirements for a certificate of authority, the director shall issue a certificate of authority to the insurer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Sec. 21.75.320.
Applicable provisions of law.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the provisions of AS

21.75.010

—

21.75.270

and

21.75.900

(2) and (3) are applicable to cooperative insurers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

21.75.010

—

21.75.270

and

21.75.900

(2) and (3)” was substituted for “AS

21.75.010

—

21.75.270

” to reflect the 1992 renumbering of AS

21.75.280

and

21.75.290

.

Sec. 21.75.330.
Coverage.

A cooperative insurer organized under AS

21.75.300

is authorized to transact only property insurance, limited to physical damage of

licensed private passenger motor vehicles;

single-family residences, and related structures;

multiple dwellings of not more than four-family units if at least one unit is owner-occupied, and related structures;

mobile homes;

commercial structures of not more than $100,000 value.

Cooperative insurance coverage is limited to risks located or principally garaged within a geographic radius determined by the director to be within the ability of the insureds to control and have an influence over the level of loss.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 1978)

Sec. 21.75.340.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991.]